Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-913.03
Hearing officer; prehearing conference and hearing; how conducted.

The hearing officer may conduct all or part of the prehearing conference and the hearing by telephone, television, or other electronic means if each participant in the conference or hearing has an opportunity to participate in, to hear, and, if technically feasible, to see the entire proceeding while it is taking place. This section does not apply to a prehearing conference or a hearing held under sections 60-498.01 to 60-498.04.

Laws 1994, LB 446, § 31;

Laws 2003, LB 209, § 20.

Telephonic hearings under this section are permitted when a formal "rules of evidence" hearing is requested pursuant to section 84-914(1). Kimball v. Nebraska Dept. of Motor Vehicles, 255 Neb. 430, 586 N.W.2d 439 (1998).

Whether the hearing is conducted by videoconference is permissive and discretionary. Robbins v. Neth, 15 Neb. App. 67, 722 N.W.2d 76 (2006).